espeak-data/dictsource/ang_rules
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Anglo Saxon
// This file is UTF8 encoded.

// Special characters:
// A  vowel:   a ā æ ǣ e ē i ī o ō u ū y ȳ

// for 'c'
.L01 a ā o ō u ū y ȳ
.L02 e ē i ī

// for 'g' and 'h'
.L03 a ā o ō u ū
.L04 e ē i ī
.L05 a ā o ō u ū

// 'voiced' sounds: vowels
.L06 a ā æ ǣ e ē i ī o ō u ū y ȳ
// 'voiced' sounds: consonants
.L07 b d l w

.replace
        qu cw
        z  ts
        uu w
        
        // wynn rune
        ƿ  w

        // yogh rune
        ȝ  g

        // normalise ð and þ
        ð  þ

        // various vowel accents/markups
        ae æ
        æq ǣ
        ǽ  ǣ

        aq ā
        á  ā

        eq ē
        é  ē

        iq ī
        í  ī

        oq ō
        ó  ō

        uq ū
        ú  ū

        yq ȳ
        ý  ȳ

// Vowels

.group a
        a        a
     _) a (@P1   a      // 'a-' prefix

.group ā
        ā        a:
     _) ā (@P1   a:     // 'ā-' prefix

.group æ
        æ        &
     _) æt (@P2  &t     // 'æt-' prefix
 
.group ǣ
        ǣ        &:
     _) ǣ        _:&:

.group e
        e        e
     _) e        _:e
        e (_S1	 e2

.group ē
        ē        e:
     _) ē        _:e:

.group i
        i        i
     _) i        _:i
        isc (_S3 iS	// '-isc' suffix

.group ī
        ī        i:
     _) ī        _:i:

.group o
        o        o
     _) o        _:o
     _) on (@P2  _:on     // on- prefix

.group ō
        ō        o:
     _) ō        _:o:

.group u
        u        u
     _) u        _:u

.group ū
        ū        u:
     _) ū        _:u:

.group y
        y        y
     _) y        _:y

.group ȳ
        ȳ        y:
     _) ȳ        _:y:

// Diphthongs

.group ea
        ea       &a
     _) ea       _:&a
    _C) ea       '&a

.group ē
        ēa       ea
     _) ēa       _:ea
    _C) ēa       'ea

.group eo
        eo       eo
     _) eo       _:eo
    _C) eo       'eo

.group ēo
        ēo       e:o
     _) ēo       _:e:o
    _C) ēo       'e:o

.group ie
        ie       ie
     _) ie       _:ie
    _C) ie       'ie

.group īe
        īe       i:e
     _) īe       _:i:e
    _C) īe       'i:e

.group io
        io       io
     _) io       _:io
    _C) io       'io

.group īo
        īo       i:o
     _) īo       _:i:o
    _C) īo       'i:o

// Consonants

.group b
        b        b
     _) be (@P2  be     // 'be-' prefix

.group c
        c        k      // if in doubt, hard

        c (C     k      // hard before consonants

        c (L01   k      // hard before and, when final, after L01
   L01) c (_     k

     æ) c (_     k      // hard finally after short æ or e
     e) c (_     k

        c (L02   tS     // soft before long/short i, e
   L02) c (L02   tS     // soft between long/short i, e

     i) c (_     tS     // soft finally after i/ī
     ī) c (_     tS

     ē) c (_     tS     // soft finally after ē, ǣ

     ǣ) c (+     tS     // soft after ǣ

// explicitly noted soft c
.group ċ
        ċ        tS

.group cg
        cg (+    dZ

.group d
        d        d
        d (_N    d_:

.group f
     _) f        f      // initial or final, voiceless 'f'
        f (_N    f
        f        v      // voiced when medial
     _) for (@P3 for    // 'for-' prefix

.group g
        g        g      // default, hard
        g (_     g_:

     _) g (C     g      // hard initially before consonants
        g (L03   g      // hard before a, o and u

     _) g (L04   _:j    // soft initially before long/short e, i
   L04) g        j      // soft after long/short e, i
     e) g (_     j      // soft finally after e, i or æ
     i) g (_     j
     æ) g (_     j

   L05) g        x
   L05) g (L05   x

     _) ge (C@P2 je     // "ge-" is a standard prefix

// explcit soft g
.group ġ
        ġ        j

.group h
        h        xh     // 'ch' as in ModE 'loch'
     _) h        h      // initially, h as in ModE. house
   L04) h        C      // Germanic 'ch' after e, i

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group ng
        ng       N

.group p
        p        p

.group r
        r        R      // default 'R'
        r (C     r/     // 'American' style before consonant or final
        r (_     r/   

.group s
        s        s

   L06) s (L06   z      // between vowels

   L07) s        z      // next to voiced consonants
        s (L07   z

.group sc
        sc       S

.group t
        t        t

.group þ
        þ        D      // voiced when initial or medial
        þ (_     T      // voiceless when final

.group w
        w        w
        w (_     w_

.group x
        x        ks

.group
        . (.     _:
    \.) .
